District of Columbia statutes.
25-501

Annual fees.

(a)

License fees shall be paid annually. The fee for the first year shall be paid at the time of application and the renewal fee shall be paid on or before the anniversary date of issuance of the license.

(b)

The applicant shall pay the initial license fee to the D.C. Treasurer. The applicant’s duplicate receipt shall accompany the application for license. If the application for the license is denied, the fee shall be returned. This subsection shall not apply to an application for a temporary license.

(c)

A licensee’s failure to timely remit the annual fee shall be cause for the Board to suspend the license until the licensee pays the fee and any fines imposed by the Board for late payment. If a licensee is 90 days delinquent on payment of the renewal fee, the Board shall give notice to the licensee of its intent to revoke the license. The licensee shall have 14 days to respond to the notice. If the Board thereafter determines that the failure to pay the fees and fines is not for good cause, the Board shall revoke the license.

(d)

The Board may establish license periods at intervals necessary to facilitate efficient processing of applications. If the Board changes a license period, the licensee shall pay the proportionate amount of the annual license fee. If the Board issues a license for less than one year, the licensee shall pay a fee reduced by the proportionate amount of the annual fee.

(e)

The fee for a temporary license shall be assessed according to the number of days for which the license is issued and shall be paid at the time of the application.

(f)

The minimum fee for a stipulated license issued by the Board pursuant to section 200 of Title 23 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (23 DCMR § 200) shall be $100.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(t), 60 DCR 3410

History

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-310 added (f).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary addition of (f), see § 2(t) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-597, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1001).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(t) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).

Emergency Legislation